New York, session 2025-2026, A3398.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. (a) The department of environmental conservation shall 2 conduct a beneficial use study to determine ecological restoration needs 3 in Jamaica Bay. Such study shall include, but not be limited to: 4 (i) a description of the bathymetry of target areas of Jamaica Bay and 5 a map of the borrow pits; 6 (ii) the ecological service quality of the borrow pits over multiple 7 weather seasons at multiple depths, including in-depth analysis of the 8 populations of fin fish species that utilize such areas during different 9 seasons; 10 (iii) the geotechnical conditions of all pit bottoms; 11 (iv) the significance of the borrow pits regarding the absorption of 12 heat during summer months when adjacent shallow areas experience ulva 13 sulfide conditions; and 14 (v) any other policy recommendations regarding the ecological restora- 15 tion of Jamaica Bay. 16 (b) The department of environmental conservation shall: 17 (i) issue a report on the findings of such study to the governor, the 18 temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly no 19 later than March 30, 2030; and 20 (ii) publish such report on the department of environmental conserva- 21 tion's website. 22 (c) There shall be a moratorium of any placement of any type of sedi- 23 ment or fill into the borrow pits in Jamaica Bay for a period of five 24 years commencing on the effective date of this act, or until the study 25 is completed and published, whichever is later. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03536-01-5